Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Custody

403.260.
Custody — Jurisdiction, commencement of proceedings. [Repealed.]

403.270.
Custodial issues — Best interests of child shall determine — Rebuttable presumption that joint custody and equally shared parenting time is in child’s best interests — De facto custodian.

As used in this chapter and KRS

405.020

, unless the context requires otherwise, “de facto custodian” means a person who has been shown by clear and convincing evidence to have been the primary caregiver for, and financial supporter of, a child who within the last two (2) years has resided with the person for an aggregate period of six (6) months or more if the child is under three (3) years of age and for an aggregate period of one (1) year or more if the child is three (3) years of age or older or has been placed by the Department for Community Based Services. Any period of time after a legal proceeding has been commenced by a parent seeking to regain custody of the child shall not be included in determining whether the child has resided with the person for the required minimum period.

A person shall not be a de facto custodian until a court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the person meets the definition of de facto custodian established in paragraph (a) of this subsection. Once a court determines that a person meets the definition of de facto custodian, the court shall give the person the same standing in custody matters that is given to each parent under this section and KRS

403.280

,

403.340

,

403.350

,

403.822

, and

405.020

.

The court shall determine custody in accordance with the best interests of the child and equal consideration shall be given to each parent and to any de facto custodian. Subject to KRS

403.315

, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by a preponderance of evidence, that joint custody and equally shared parenting time is in the best interest of the child. If a deviation from equal parenting time is warranted, the court shall construct a parenting time schedule which maximizes the time each parent or de facto custodian has with the child and is consistent with ensuring the child’s welfare. The court shall consider all relevant factors including:

The wishes of the child’s parent or parents, and any de facto custodian, as to his or her custody;

The wishes of the child as to his or her custodian, with due consideration given to the influence a parent or de facto custodian may have over the child’s wishes;

The interaction and interrelationship of the child with his or her parent or parents, his or her siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect the child’s best interests;

The motivation of the adults participating in the custody proceeding;

The child’s adjustment and continuing proximity to his or her home, school, and community;

The mental and physical health of all individuals involved;

A finding by the court that domestic violence and abuse, as defined in KRS

403.720

, has been committed by one (1) of the parties against a child of the parties or against another party. The court shall determine the extent to which the domestic violence and abuse has affected the child and the child’s relationship to each party, with due consideration given to efforts made by a party toward the completion of any domestic violence treatment, counseling, or program;

The extent to which the child has been cared for, nurtured, and supported by any de facto custodian;

The intent of the parent or parents in placing the child with a de facto custodian;

The circumstances under which the child was placed or allowed to remain in the custody of a de facto custodian, including whether the parent now seeking custody was previously prevented from doing so as a result of domestic violence as defined in KRS

403.720

and whether the child was placed with a de facto custodian to allow the parent now seeking custody to seek employment, work, or attend school; and

The likelihood a party will allow the child frequent, meaningful, and continuing contact with the other parent or de facto custodian, except that the court shall not consider this likelihood if there is a finding that the other parent or de facto custodian engaged in domestic violence and abuse, as defined in KRS 403.720, against the party or a child and that a continuing relationship with the other parent will endanger the health or safety of either that party or the child.

The abandonment of the family residence by a custodial party shall not be considered where said party was physically harmed or was seriously threatened with physical harm by his or her spouse, when such harm or threat of harm was causally related to the abandonment.

If the court grants custody to a de facto custodian, the de facto custodian shall have legal custody under the laws of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 17; 1978, ch. 86, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 369, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 169, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 250, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 51, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 133, § 42, effective July 13, 2004; 2018 ch. 198, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 132, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

403.280.
Temporary custody orders.

A party to a custody proceeding may move for a temporary custody order. The motion must be supported by an affidavit as provided in KRS

403.350

. The court may award temporary custody under the standards of KRS

403.270

after a hearing, or, if there is no objection, solely on the basis of the affidavits. If the parents or a de facto custodian joined under subsection (9) of this section present a temporary custody agreement and mutually agreed plan for parenting time, and the court confirms that the agreement adequately provides for the welfare of the child, the agreement shall become the temporary custody order of the court.

Subject to KRS

403.315

, in making an order for temporary custody, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by preponderance of evidence, that it is in the best interest of the child for the parents or a de facto custodian joined under subsection (9) of this section to have temporary joint custody and share equally in parenting time.

If a deviation from equal parenting time is warranted, the court shall construct a parenting time schedule which maximizes the time each parent or de facto custodian joined under subsection (9) of this section has with the child and is consistent with ensuring the child’s welfare.

Each temporary custody order shall include specific findings of fact and conclusions of law, except when the court confirms the agreement of the parties.

Any temporary custody order shall address the circumstance in which physical possession of the child will be exchanged.

Modification of a temporary custody order may be sought when there is a material and substantial change in the circumstances of the parents, de facto custodian, or child.

If a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation is dismissed, any temporary custody order is vacated unless a parent or the child’s custodian moves that the proceeding continue as a custody proceeding and the court finds, after a hearing, that the circumstances of the parents and the best interests of the child require that a custody decree be issued.

If a custody proceeding commenced in the absence of a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation under KRS 403.822(1)(a) or (b) is dismissed, any temporary custody order is vacated.

If a court determines by clear and convincing evidence that a person is a de facto custodian, the court shall join that person in the action, as a party needed for just adjudication under Rule 19 of the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 18; 1998, ch. 250, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 133, § 43, effective July 13, 2004; 2017 ch. 163, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 198, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 94, § 31, effective June 29, 2021.

403.290.
Child: court may interview, court may seek advice of professional personnel.

The court may interview the child in chambers to ascertain the child’s wishes as to his custodian and as to visitation. The court may permit counsel to be present at the interview. The court shall cause a record of the interview to be made and to be part of the record in the case.

The court may seek the advice of professional personnel, whether or not employed by the court on a regular basis. The advice given shall be in writing and made available by the court to counsel upon request. Counsel may examine as a witness any professional personnel consulted by the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 19.

403.300.
Investigation: court may order in custody proceedings — Attorney to receive copy.

In contested custody proceedings, and in other custody proceedings if a parent or the child’s custodian so requests, the court may order an investigation and report concerning custodial arrangements for the child. The investigation and report may be made by the friend of the court or such other agency as the court may select.

In preparing his report concerning a child, the investigator may consult any person who may have information about the child and his potential custodial arrangements. Upon order of the court, the investigator may refer the child to professional personnel for diagnosis. The investigator may consult with and obtain information from medical, psychiatric, or other expert persons who have served the child in the past without obtaining the consent of the parent or the child’s custodian; but the child’s consent must be obtained if he has reached the age of 16, unless the court finds that he lacks mental capacity to consent. If the requirements of subsection (3) are fulfilled, the investigator’s report may be received in evidence at the hearing.

The clerk shall mail the investigator’s report to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel at least 10 days prior to the hearing. The investigator shall make available to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel the investigator’s file of underlying data, and reports, complete texts of diagnostic reports made to the investigator pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2), and the names and addresses of all persons whom the investigator has consulted. Any party to the proceeding may call the investigator and any person whom he has consulted for cross-examination. A party may not waive his right of cross-examination prior to the hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 20.

403.310.
Hearings: custody proceedings shall receive priority.

Custody proceedings shall receive priority in being set for hearing.

The court may tax as costs the payment of necessary travel and other expenses incurred by any person whose presence at the hearing the court deems necessary to determine the best interests of the child.

The court without a jury shall determine questions of law and fact. If it finds that a public hearing may be detrimental to the child’s best interests, the court may exclude the public from a custody hearing, but may admit any person who has a direct and legitimate interest in the particular case or a legitimate educational or research interest in the work of the court.

If the court finds it necessary to protect the child’s welfare that the record of any interview, report, investigation, or testimony in a custody proceeding be kept secret, the court may make an appropriate order sealing the record.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 21.

403.315.
Presumption that joint custody and equally shared parenting time is in best interest of child inapplicable if domestic violence order entered against a party.

When determining or modifying a custody order pursuant to KRS

403.270

,

403.280

,

403.340

, or

403.740

, the court shall consider the safety and well-being of the parties and of the children. If a domestic violence order is being or has been entered against a party by another party or on behalf of a child at issue in the custody hearing, the presumption that joint custody and equally shared parenting time is in the best interest of the child shall not apply as to the party against whom the domestic violence order is being or has been entered. The court shall weigh all factors set out in KRS

403.270

(2) in determining the best interest of the child.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 198, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

403.320.
Visitation of minor child — Visitation rights of custodial relatives following termination of parental rights of others.

A parent not granted custody of the child and not awarded shared parenting time under the presumption specified in KRS 403.270(2), 403.280(2), or 403.340(5) is entitled to reasonable visitation rights unless the court finds, after a hearing, that visitation would endanger seriously the child’s physical, mental, moral, or emotional health. Upon request of either party, the court shall issue orders which are specific as to the frequency, timing, duration, conditions, and method of scheduling visitation and which reflect the development age of the child.

If domestic violence and abuse, as defined in KRS

403.720

, has been alleged, the court shall, after a hearing, determine the visitation arrangement, if any, which would not endanger seriously the child’s or the custodial parent’s physical, mental, or emotional health.

The court may modify an order granting or denying visitation rights whenever modification would serve the best interests of the child; but the court shall not restrict a parent’s visitation rights unless it finds that the visitation would endanger seriously the child’s physical, mental, moral, or emotional health.

Under circumstances where the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, it is in the best interest of the child, any relative, by blood or affinity, that was previously granted temporary custody pursuant to the provisions of KRS

620.090

may be granted reasonable noncustodial parental visitation rights by a Circuit Court or Family Court as an intervenor or by original action. Once the relative has been granted visitation pursuant to this subsection, those rights shall not be adversely affected by the termination of custodial or parental rights of an individual who has permanent custody of the child unless the court determines that termination of the visitation rights are in the best interests of the child. The action shall be brought in the county in which the temporary or permanent custody order was entered or where the child resides.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 22; 1992, ch. 169, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 414, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2013, ch. 79, § 1, effective March 22, 2013; 2018 ch. 198, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 94, § 32, effective June 29, 2021.

403.322.
Custody, visitation, and inheritance rights denied parent convicted of felony sexual offense from which victim delivered a child — Waiver — Child support obligation.

The Commonwealth recognizes that certain victims of sexual assault may conceive a child as a result of the sexual assault and may choose to bear and raise the child. The Commonwealth also recognizes that victims of a sexual assault who have elected to raise a child born as a result of the sexual assault, as well as that child, may suffer serious emotional or physical trauma if the perpetrator of the assault is granted parental rights with the child.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any person who has been convicted of a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510, or a comparable offense from another jurisdiction, in which the victim of that offense has conceived and delivered a child, shall not have custody or visitation rights, or the rights of inheritance under KRS Chapter 391 with respect to that child.

The adult mother of the child may waive the protection afforded under subsection (2) of this section regarding visitation and request that the court grant reasonable visitation rights with the child if paternity has been acknowledged.

Unless waived by the mother, or a guardian of a minor mother or a de facto custodian of the child in the case of a minor mother, and, if applicable, the public agency substantially contributing to the support of the child, a court shall establish a child support obligation against the father of the child pursuant to KRS

403.211

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

403.325.
Visitation denied parent convicted of homicide of other parent — Exception — Hearing required.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

403.320

, if a parent of a child is convicted of murder or manslaughter in the first degree of the other parent, a court shall not grant the convicted parent visitation rights with respect to that child unless the court, through a hearing, determines that visitation is in the child’s best interest.

If the court later modifies a denial of visitation to grant visitation, the court shall do so only after a hearing which establishes that visitation is in the child’s best interest.

In any hearing conducted under subsection (1) or (2) of this section:

Jurisdiction shall lie with the Circuit Court of the county where the child resides; and

The convicted parent, to obtain visitation, shall have to meet the burden of proving that visitation is in the child’s best interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

403.330.
Judicial supervision of custody decree or agreement.

Except as otherwise agreed by the parties in writing at the time of the custody decree, the custodian may determine the child’s upbringing, including his education, health care, and religious training, unless the court after hearing, finds, upon motion by the noncustodial parent, that in the absence of a specific limitation of the custodian’s authority, the child’s physical health would be endangered or his emotional development significantly impaired.

If both parents or all contestants agree to the order, or if the court finds that in the absence of the order the child’s physical health would be endangered or his emotional development significantly impaired, the court may order the local probation, another appropriate local entity, or if currently involved in the case, the child welfare department to exercise continuing supervision over the case to assure that the custodial or visitation terms of the decree are carried out.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 23; 1998, ch. 338, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

403.340.
Modification of custody decree.

As used in this section, “custody” means sole or joint custody, whether ordered by a court or agreed to by the parties.

No motion to modify a custody decree shall be made earlier than two (2) years after its date, unless the court permits it to be made on the basis of affidavits that there is reason to believe that:

The child’s present environment may endanger seriously his physical, mental, moral, or emotional health; or

The custodian appointed under the prior decree has placed the child with a de facto custodian.

If a court of this state has jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act, the court shall not modify a prior custody decree unless after hearing it finds, upon the basis of facts that have arisen since the prior decree or that were unknown to the court at the time of entry of the prior decree, that a change has occurred in the circumstances of the child or his custodian, and that the modification is necessary to serve the best interests of the child. When determining if a change has occurred and whether a modification of custody is in the best interests of the child, the court shall consider the following:

Whether the custodian agrees to the modification;

Whether the child has been integrated into the family of the petitioner with consent of the custodian;

The factors set forth in KRS 403.270(2) to determine the best interests of the child;

Whether the child’s present environment endangers seriously his physical, mental, moral, or emotional health;

Whether the harm likely to be caused by a change of environment is outweighed by its advantages to him; and

Whether the custodian has placed the child with a de facto custodian.

In determining whether a child’s present environment may endanger seriously his physical, mental, moral, or emotional health, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to:

The interaction and interrelationship of the child with his parent or parents, his de facto custodian, his siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect the child’s best interests;

The mental and physical health of all individuals involved;

Repeated or substantial failure, without good cause as specified in KRS

403.240

, of either parent to observe visitation, child support, or other provisions of the decree which affect the child, except that modification of custody orders shall not be made solely on the basis of failure to comply with visitation or child support provisions, or on the basis of which parent is more likely to allow visitation or pay child support;

If domestic violence and abuse, as defined in KRS

403.720

, is found by the court to exist, the extent to which the domestic violence and abuse has affected the child and the child’s relationship to both parents.

Subject to KRS

403.315

, if the court orders a modification of a child custody decree, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by a preponderance of evidence, that it is in the best interest of the child for the parents to have joint custody and share equally in parenting time. If a deviation from equal parenting time is warranted, the court shall construct a parenting time schedule which maximizes the time each parent or de facto custodian has with the child and is consistent with ensuring the child’s welfare.

Attorney fees and costs shall be assessed against a party seeking modification if the court finds that the modification action is vexatious and constitutes harassment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 24; 1992, ch. 414, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 250, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 161, § 2, effective March 21, 2001; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 10, effective April 25, 2006; 2018 ch. 198, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 94, § 33, effective June 29, 2021.

403.350.
Affidavit required with motion for temporary custody order or for modification of custody decree.

A party seeking a temporary custody order or modification of a custody decree shall submit together with his moving papers an affidavit setting forth facts supporting the requested order or modification and shall give notice, together with a copy of his affidavit, to other parties to the proceeding, who may file opposing affidavits. If a court determines that a child is in the custody of a de facto custodian, the court shall make the de facto custodian a party to the proceeding. The court shall deny the motion unless it finds that adequate cause for hearing the motion is established by the affidavits, in which case it shall set a date for hearing on an order to show cause why the requested order or modification should not be granted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 182, § 25; 1998, ch. 250, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

403.352.
Power of attorney for temporary delegation of parental rights and responsibilities regarding care and custody of a child.

A parent or legal guardian of a child, by a properly executed power of attorney, as established in this section and KRS

403.353

, may temporarily delegate to another person, named in the instrument as the attorney-in-fact, for a period not to exceed one (1) year any of the traditional parental rights and responsibilities regarding care and custody of the child except the following authorities:

Consent for the child to marry;

Consent for an abortion or inducement of an abortion to be performed on or for the child; or

The termination of parental rights to the child.

A temporary delegation of rights and responsibilities under this section shall not:

Operate to change or modify any parental or legal rights, obligations, or authority established by an existing court order; or

Deprive the parent or legal custodian of any parental or legal rights, obligations, or authority regarding the custody, visitation, or support of the child.

The parent or legal custodian of the child shall have the authority to revoke or withdraw the power of attorney authorized by this section at any time.

Upon the termination, withdrawal, expiration, or revocation of the power of attorney established by this section, the child shall be returned to the custody of the parent or legal guardian as soon as reasonably possible.

The attorney-in-fact named in the instrument as established by this section shall not be compensated for serving as the attorney-in-fact pursuant to this section.

Unless the power of attorney established by this section is terminated, revoked, or withdrawn, the attorney-in-fact named in the instrument shall exercise parental or legal authority on a continuous basis for the duration of the power of attorney established by this section.

An attorney-in-fact properly appointed pursuant to this section and in compliance with this section shall not be subject to any statutes dealing with the licensing or regulation of foster care homes or other child-care facility licensing statutes, and the appointment of an attorney-in-fact pursuant to this section and KRS

403.353

shall not constitute an out-of-home child placement.

The child or children subject to the power of attorney established in this section shall not be considered placed in foster care, and the parties involved in the power of attorney established in this section shall not be subject to any requirements, monitoring, or other regulation for foster care or community care solely because of the execution of an instrument authorized pursuant to this section or KRS

403.353

.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the execution of a power of attorney as established pursuant to this section by a parent or legal guardian shall not by itself constitute evidence of abandonment, abuse, or neglect, unless the parent or legal guardian fails to take custody of the child or execute a new power of attorney after the one (1) year time limit has elapsed. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prevent an investigation of abuse, neglect, abandonment, other mistreatment of a child, or other crime.

A parent or legal guardian shall not execute a power of attorney pursuant to this section or KRS

403.353

with the intention of permanently avoiding or divesting himself or herself of parental or legal responsibility for the care of the child or for any other illegal or fraudulent purpose.

An attorney-in-fact or prospective attorney-in-fact designated or potentially designated pursuant to this section or KRS

403.353

shall not demand or request that a parent or guardian enter into an instrument established pursuant to this section or KRS 403.353 as a result of any person’s financial or other debt or obligation, or for any other illegal or fraudulent purpose.

A power of attorney established pursuant to this section and KRS 403.353 shall not be used solely for the purpose of establishing residency for school attendance purposes unless the child actually resides with the attorney-in-fact in the school district where the enrollment is sought, or the child otherwise resides in the district.

Violation of this section shall be punishable under Kentucky law.

If a parent or legal guardian of a child chooses to delegate powers pursuant to this section regarding the care and custody of the child to a person or persons other than a grandparent, aunt, uncle, or adult sibling of the child, a full criminal history and child abuse and neglect background check shall be conducted on the person or persons prior to the execution of the power of attorney authorized by this section. The results of the background check shall be kept with the instrument establishing the power of attorney pursuant to this section. A child shall not be placed with an individual whose background check indicates that he or she has a criminal history of child abuse and neglect.

Any period of time during which a child resides with an attorney-in-fact under an unexpired and valid power of attorney properly executed pursuant to this section and KRS

403.353

, shall not be included in determining whether the child has resided with the attorney-in-fact for the minimum period required to be designated a de facto custodian pursuant to KRS 403.270(1).

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 94, § 34, effective June 29, 2021.

403.353.
Form of power of attorney authorized by this section, KRS 403.352, and KRS Chapter 403A.

A power of attorney established pursuant to this section, KRS

403.352

, and KRS Chapter 403A shall be substantially in the following form, and may include other specific directions which are in accordance with accepted legal practice and not specifically prohibited by any other statute. If any other specific directions are held by a court of appropriate jurisdiction to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect the power of attorney or other provisions established in this section, KRS

403.352

, and KRS Chapter 403A.

The power of attorney is legally sufficient under this section, KRS

403.352

, and KRS Chapter 403A if the wording of the form complies substantially with subsection (1) of this section, the form is properly completed and signed, and the form or parties are not otherwise invalid pursuant to KRS

403.352

.

“Power of Attorney for Temporary Delegation of Parental or Legal Custody and Care 1. I certify that I am the parent or legal guardian of: (Full name of minor child) (Date of birth) (Full name of minor child) (Date of birth) (Full name of minor child) (Date of birth) 2. I designate (Full name of Attorney-in-fact), (Street address, city, state, and zip code of Attorney-in-fact) (Home phone of Attorney-in-fact) (Work phone of Attorney-in-fact) as the Attorney-in-fact of each minor child named above. 3. I delegate to the Attorney-in-fact all of my power and authority regarding the care, custody, and property of each minor child named above, including but not limited to the right to enroll the child in school, inspect and obtain copies of education records and other records concerning the child, the right to attend school activities and other functions concerning the child, and the right to give or withhold any consent or waiver with respect to school activities, medical and dental treatment, and any other activity, function, or treatment that may concern the child. This delegation shall not include the power or authority to consent to marriage or adoption of the child, the performance or inducement of an abortion on or for the child, or the termination of parental rights to the child. OR In the event that Section 4 is completed, Section 3 does not apply. 4. I delegate to the Attorney-in-fact the following specific powers and responsibilities (write in): 5. This power of attorney is effective for a period not to exceed one (1) year, beginning , 20, and ending , 20. I reserve the right to revoke this authority at any time ORIn the event Section 6 is completed and valid, Section 5 does not apply. 6. I am a parent or legal guardian on active duty as governed by KRS Chapter 403A. My active duty service is scheduled to begin on , 20, and is estimated to end on , 20. I acknowledge that in no event may this delegation of power last more than one (1) year or the term of my active duty plus thirty (30) days, whichever is longer. 7. BY: (Parent/Legal Guardian signature) 8. I hereby accept my designation as Attorney-in-fact for the minor child or children specified in this power of attorney. (Attorney-in-fact signature) County of ACKNOWLEDGMENT Before me, the undersigned, a Notary Public, in and for said County and State on this day of , 20, personally appeared (Name of Parent/Legal Guardian) (Name of Attorney-in-fact), to me known to be the identical persons who executed this instrument and acknowledged to me that each executed the same as his or her free and voluntary act and deed for the uses and purposes set forth in the instrument. Witness my hand and official seal the day and year above written. (Signature of notary public) My commission expires: .”

Click to view

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 94, § 35, effective June 29, 2021.

403.355.
Definition of “safe child drop-off location” — Child custody exchanges in these locations.

As used in this section, “safe child drop-off location” means any public building owned, leased, or occupied by the Commonwealth, or by any city or county within the Commonwealth, to which access is limited and security measures, including metal detectors, are in place.

Any separation agreement, decree of divorce, temporary custody order, or post-decree order may require that exchanges of child custody take place in a safe child drop-off location at a point past the metal detectors and other security measures.

Public buildings owned, leased, or occupied by the Commonwealth, or by any city or county within the Commonwealth, to which access is limited and in which security measures, including metal detectors, are in place, may allow access to spaces otherwise open to the public for use as a safe child drop-off location, but no such building shall be required to make any other accommodation for such use.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 79, § 2, effective March 22, 2013.